src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
Compounding
* +Cmp Dynamic compound - this tag should always be part of a dynamic compound.
It is important for Apertium, and useful in other cases as well.
* +Cmp/Hyph-Coll with nouns
* +Cmp/Hyph-Redup with verbs
* +Cmp/Hyph-Synonym with verbs
* +Cmp/Hyph-Serial with verbs
* +Cmp/Hyph-tejems with verbs

## Tags
* +Emphatic 
* +Gr2xxx 
* +Pref Prefix
* +Exclusive "ансяк" only
* +Intensive 
* +Intensifier уш

* +Onom onomapoetic words
* +Descr descriptive words
## Different focus particles
Focus clitics
* +Clt/Add Only one additive clitic
* +Clt/AddGak 

## Imperative clitics
* +Clt/Ga редяка Precative +Prec
* +Clt/Gaja редякая
* +Clt/Gajatj редякаять
* +Clt/Gajatja редякаятя
* +Clt/Gatja редякатя
* +Clt/Gaka редякака ARE these real?
* +Clt/Gakaja редякакая ARE these real?
* +Pred2 secondary predicate. Examples:
"Joe came in **with his hat on**."
"Joe came in **Joe had his hat on**."

### Tags distinguishing different versions of the same lemma (before POS)
* +v1
* +v2
* +v3
* +v4
* +v5
* +v6
* +v7
* +v8
* +v9
* +v10
* +v11
* +v12
* +v13
* +v14
* +v15
* +v16
* +v17
* +v18
* +v19
* +v20
* +v21
* +v22
* +v23
* +v24

* +ACC +DAT +COM This marks a function not a morpheme

* +NoPoss used with personal pronouns in oblique cases,
where a possessor index is expected

### Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):

* »
* «
* > (written with square brackets, see the root.lexc file)
* < (written with square brackets, see the root.lexc file)

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

Flags used to identify parts of speech
* @P.POS.PRON@ 
* @U.POS.N@ 
* @U.POS.NUM@ 
* @U.POS.A@ 

* @P.POS.N@ 
* @R.POS.N@ 
* @P.POS.NUM@ 
* @R.POS.NUM@ 
* @P.POS.A@ 
* @R.POS.A@ 
* @P.POS.V@ 
* @R.POS.V@ 
* @C.POS@ 

Flags used with +Clt/Cop nonverbal predication
* @U.PRED.NO@ 
* @U.PRED.YES@ 
* @C.PRED@ 

Flags used with transitivity
* @U.TRANS.TV@ 
* @U.TRANS.IV@ 
* @P.TRANS.TV@ 
* @P.TRANS.IV@ 
Flags used with serial verbs
* @U.CONJ-INF.YES@ 
* @U.CONJ-INF.NO@ 

* @U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ 
* @U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@ 
* @U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@ 

* @U.CONJ-MX.IND@ 
* @D.CONJ-MX.IND@  2012-11-04 should this be --D-- or --N--
* @U.CONJ-MX.IMP@ 
* @U.CONJ-MX.OPT@ 
* @U.CONJ-MX.PREC@ 
* @U.CONJ-MX.DES@ 
* @U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@ 
* @U.CONJ-MX.COND@ 

* @U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ 
* @U.CONJ-CONNEG.NO@ 

* @U.CONJ-NX.PL@ 
* @U.CONJ-NX.SG@ 

* @U.CONJ-POSS.1@ 
* @U.CONJ-POSS.2@ 
* @U.CONJ-POSS.3@ 
* @U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@ 
* @U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@ 

* @U.CONJ-PX.10@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.12@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.13@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.15@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.16@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.20@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.21@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.23@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.24@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.26@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.30@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.31@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.32@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.33@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.34@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.35@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.36@ 

* @U.CONJ-PX.40@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.42@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.43@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.45@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.46@ 

* @U.CONJ-PX.50@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.51@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.53@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.54@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.56@ 

* @U.CONJ-PX.60@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.61@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.62@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.63@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.64@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.65@ 
* @U.CONJ-PX.66@ 

* @R.CONJ-PX.13@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.16@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.23@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.26@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.33@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.36@ 

* @R.CONJ-PX.43@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.46@ 

* @R.CONJ-PX.53@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.56@ 

* @R.CONJ-PX.63@ 
* @R.CONJ-PX.66@ 

* @P.CONJ.ObjAll@ 
* @R.CONJ.ObjAll@ 
* @C.CONJ@ 
* @P.TLOSS.ON@ 
* @R.TLOSS.ON@ 

* @P.PossPx.Sg1@ 
* @P.PossPx.Sg2@ 
* @P.PossPx.Sg3@ 
* @P.PossPx.Pl1@ 
* @P.PossPx.Pl2@ 
* @P.PossPx.Pl3@ 

* @U.PossPx.S3@ 
* @U.PossPx.SP3@ 

* @U.PossPx.Sg1@ 
* @U.PossPx.Sg2@ 
* @U.PossPx.Sg3@ 
* @U.PossPx.Pl1@ 
* @U.PossPx.Pl2@ 
* @U.PossPx.Pl3@ 

* @D.PossPx@ 
* @C.PossPx@ 
* @P.TNUM.SG@ 
* @P.TNUM.PL@ 
* @D.TNUM.SG@ 
* @D.TNUM.PL@ 
* @C.TNUM@ 

problematic

* @P.TPERS.1@ 
* @P.TPERS.2@ 
* @P.TPERS.3@ 
* @N.TPERS.1@ 
* @N.TPERS.2@ 
* @N.TPERS.3@ 
* @U.TPERS.1@ 
* @U.TPERS.2@ 
* @U.TPERS.3@ 
* @C.TPERS@ 

* @U.CX.ABE@ 
* @U.CX.ABL@ 
* @U.CX.CMP@ 
* @U.CX.COM@ 
* @U.CX.DAT@ 
* @U.CX.ELA@ 
* @U.CX.GEN@ 
* @R.CX.ILL@ 
* @D.CX.ILL@ 
* @U.CX.ILL@ 
* @U.CX.INE@ 
* @U.CX.LAT@ 
* @U.CX.LOC@ 
* @U.CX.NOM@ 
* @U.CX.PRL@ 
* @U.CX.TRA@ 
* @U.CX.PRL@ 
* @U.CX.TEMP@ 

* @N.CX.ILL@ 
* @N.CX.INE@ 
* @N.CX.LAT@ 
* @N.CX.ELA@ 
* @C.CX@ 

* @P.DNUM.PL@ 
* @P.DNUM.SG@ 
* @U.DNUM.PL@ 
* @U.DNUM.SG@ 
* @C.DNUM@ 

* @P.NUM.SG@ 
* @P.NUM.PL@ 
* @D.NUM.SG@ 
* @D.NUM.PL@ 
* @C.NUM@ 

* @U.INDEF.KOI@ 
* @U.INDEF.TA@ 
* @U.INDEF.TAGO@ 
* @U.INDEF.BUTI@ 
* @U.INDEF.GAK@ 
* @C.INDEF-PRON@ 
* @P.INDEF.PREF@ 
* @D.INDEF.PREF@ 
* @R.INDEF.PREF@ 
* @C.INDEF@ 

This allows or disallows combining with hyphen through loop
especially for acronyms 2012-11-04
* @U.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ 
* @D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@ 
* @C.HYPH-COMBO@ 

This disallows secondary compounding
* @U.COMPOUND.YES@
* @D.COMPOUND.YES@
* @U.COMPOUND.NO@

Linking vowel for use with Translative
* @P.LV.ON@ 
* @P.LV.OFF@ 
* @R.LV.ON@ 
* @U.LV.ON@ 
* @D.LV.ON@ 
* @C.LV@ 

* @C.CONJ-INF@ 
* @C.CONJ-TX@ 
* @C.CONJ-MX@ 
* @C.CONJ-CONNEG@ 
* @C.CONJ-NX@ 
* @C.CONJ-PX@ 
* @C.CONJ-POSS@ 

* @C.KLOSS@ 
* @C.TLOSS@ 

# FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
## number
* @U.DECL-NX.SG@
* @U.DECL-NX.SP@
* @U.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.DECL-NX.SG@
* @R.DECL-NX.SP@
* @R.DECL-NX.PL@
## case
* @U.DECL-CX.NOM@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.ACC@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.GEN@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.DAT@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.ABL@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.ILL@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.INE@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.ELA@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.LAT@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.LOC@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.TRA@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.PRL@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.COM@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.TEMP@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.ABE@ 
* @U.DECL-CX.CMP@ 

* @U.DECL-DX.DEF@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.INDEF@ 
* @U.DECL-DX.PX@ 

Removal
* @C.DECL-NX@ 
* @C.DECL-DX@ 
* @C.DECL-CX@ 

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

The word forms in ERZYA start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
Here follow all contlexes, appr 20.

* Hyphenated-nouns ; entire serial nouns
* Hyphenated-verbs ; entire serial verbs

CyrillicFemaleName ;
HUNSPELL Type name derivation
RussianMalenamesDerive ; !
RussianSurnamesDerive ;

увол-авол

alo-SPAT-1Arg ; >PO_KAL-LOC

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-myv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
